Alaska statutes. Title 32. Partnership.
Article 1. Formation and Conversion to Limited Partnership.

Sec. 32.11.010.
Formation of limited partnership.

In order to form a limited partnership, a certificate of limited partnership shall be executed and filed with the Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development. The certificate must set out

the name of the limited partnership;

the address of the office and the name and address of the agent for service of process required to be maintained by AS

32.11.830

;

the name and business address of each general partner; and

other matters the general partners determine to include.

A limited partnership is formed at the time of the filing of the certificate of limited partnership with the department or at a later time specified in the certificate of limited partnership if, in either case, there has been substantial compliance with the requirements of this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 1 ch 87 SLA 1994; am §§ 15, 23 ch 78 SLA 1997)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1999, in (a) of this section, “Department of Commerce and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Community and Economic Development” in accordance with § 88, ch. 58, SLA 1999. In 2004, in (a) of this section, “Department of Community and Economic Development” was changed to “Department of Commerce, Community, and Economic Development”, in accordance with § 3, ch. 47, SLA 2004.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Section 24(b), ch. 78, SLA 1997 provides that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department on or after July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997]” and that a “limited partnership whose original certificate of limited partnership was filed with the department before July 1, 1997, is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997], if its certificate of limited partnership is amended on or after July 1, 1997, and states that the limited partnership is governed by AS 32.11, as amended by [ch. 78, SLA 1997].” For the text of this section in effect on June 30, 1997, see the 1996 volume for AS 32.

Sec. 32.11.020.
Amendment to certificate; restated certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership is amended by filing a certificate of amendment with the department. The certificate must set out

the name of the limited partnership;

the date of filing the certificate to be amended; and

the amendment to the certificate.

Within 30 days after the following events, an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership reflecting the occurrence of the event or events shall be filed:

the admission of a new general partner;

the withdrawal of a general partner; or

the continuation of the business under AS

32.11.370

after an event of withdrawal of a general partner.

A general partner who becomes aware that a statement in a certificate of limited partnership was false when made or that an arrangement or other fact described has changed, making the certificate inaccurate, shall promptly amend the certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership may be amended at any time for any other proper purpose the general partners determine.

A person may not be held liable because an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership has not been filed to reflect the occurrence of an event referred to in (b) of this section if the amendment is filed within the 30-day period specified in (b) of this section.

A restated certificate of limited partnership may be executed and filed in the same manner as a certificate of amendment.

A certificate of limited partnership may also be amended by filing a plan of merger, interest exchange, conversion, or domestication under AS 10.55 (Alaska Entity Transactions Act).

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 2 ch 87 SLA 1994; am § 24 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective July 1, 2014, added (g).

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Under sec. 32, ch. 60, SLA 2013 in the 2013 Temporary and Special Acts, (g) of this section does not affect an action or proceeding begun or right accrued before July 1, 2014.

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, §§ 797-802.

68 C.J.S., Partnership, § 574.

Sec. 32.11.030.
Cancellation of certificate.

A certificate of limited partnership shall be canceled upon the dissolution and the commencement of winding up of the partnership or at any other time there are no limited partners. A certificate of cancellation shall be filed with the department and must set out

the name of the limited partnership;

the date of filing of its certificate of limited partnership;

the reason for filing the certificate of cancellation;

the effective date, which must be a date certain, of cancellation if it is not to be effective upon the filing of the certificate; and

other information the general partners filing the certificate determine.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.040.
Execution of certificates.

Each certificate required by AS

32.11.010

—

32.11.090

to be filed with the department shall be executed in the following manner:

an original certificate of limited partnership shall be signed by all general partners;

a certificate of amendment shall be signed by at least one general partner and by each other general partner designated in the certificate as a new general partner; and

a certificate of cancellation shall be signed by all general partners.

A person may sign a certificate by an attorney-in-fact, but a power of attorney to sign a certificate relating to the admission of a general partner must specifically describe the admission.

The execution of a certificate by a general partner constitutes an affirmation under the penalty of false swearing that the facts stated are true.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am §§ 3, 4 ch 87 SLA 1994)

Cross references. —

For penalties for perjury, see AS

11.56.200

, and for penalties for unsworn falsification, see AS

11.56.210

.

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 795 et seq.

Sec. 32.11.050.
Execution by judicial act.

If a person required by AS

32.11.040

to execute a certificate fails or refuses to do so, a person who is adversely affected by the failure or refusal may petition the superior court to direct the execution of the certificate. If the court finds that it is proper for the certificate to be executed and that a person so designated has failed or refused to execute the certificate, it shall order the department to record an appropriate certificate.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 803.

Sec. 32.11.060.
Filing with department; effect of certain filings.

An original and an exact copy of the certificate of limited partnership and of a certificate of amendment or cancellation, or of a judicial decree of amendment or cancellation, shall be delivered to the department. A person who executes a certificate as an agent or fiduciary need not exhibit evidence of the person’s authority as a prerequisite to filing. Unless the department finds that a certificate does not conform to law, upon receipt of all filing fees required by law the department shall

endorse on each original and exact copy the word “Filed” and the day, month, and year of the filing;

file the original in the department’s office; and

return the exact copy to the person who filed it or the person’s representative.

Upon the filing of a certificate of amendment or judicial decree of amendment with the department, the certificate of limited partnership is amended, and upon the effective date of a certificate of cancellation or a judicial decree of cancellation, the certificate of limited partnership is canceled.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 796.

Sec. 32.11.070.
Liability for false statement in certificate.

If a certificate of limited partnership or certificate of amendment or cancellation contains a false statement, one who suffers loss by reliance on the statement may recover damages for the loss from

a person who executes the certificate, or causes another to execute the certificate on the person’s behalf, and knew, and a general partner who knew or should have known, the statement to be false at the time the certificate was executed; and

a general partner who thereafter knows or should have known that an arrangement or other fact described in the certificate has changed, making the statement inaccurate in any respect within a sufficient time before the statement was relied upon reasonably to have enabled that general partner to cancel or amend the certificate, or to file a petition for its cancellation or amendment under AS

32.11.050

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Collateral references. —

59A Am. Jur. 2d, Partnership, § 834.

False information in certificate of limited partnership, liability under Uniform Limited Partnership Act § 6. 34 ALR2d 1454.

Sec. 32.11.080.
Scope of notice.

The fact that a certificate of limited partnership is on file with the department is notice that the partnership is a limited partnership and the persons designated in the certificate as general partners are general partners, but it is not notice of any other fact.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992; am § 5 ch 87 SLA 1994)

Editor’s notes. —

Section 23, ch. 87, SLA 1994 provides that the 1994 amendment to this section “is retroactive to July 1, 1993, to the extent constitutionally permissible.”

Sec. 32.11.090.
Delivery of certificates to limited partners.

Upon the return by the department under AS

32.11.060

of a certificate marked “Filed,” the general partners shall promptly deliver or mail a copy of the certificate of limited partnership and each certificate of amendment or cancellation to each limited partner unless the partnership agreement provides otherwise.

History.

(§ 1 ch 128 SLA 1992)

Sec. 32.11.095.
Conversion of certain entities to a limited partnership. [Repealed, § 29 ch 60 SLA 2013.]